Florida, session 2026, SB460.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 44 45 Section 1.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 100.111, 46 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 47 100.111âFilling vacancy.â 48 (1)(a)âIf any vacancy occurs in any office which is 49 required to be filled pursuant to s. 1(f), Art. IV of the State 50 Constitution and the remainder of the term of such office is 28 51 months or longer, then at the next general election a person 52 must shall be elected to fill the unexpired portion of such 53 term, commencing on the first Tuesday after the first Monday 54 following such general election. 55 (b)âIf such a vacancy occurs before prior to the ninth day 56 before the first day set by law for qualifying for election to 57 office at such general election, any person seeking nomination 58 or election to the unexpired portion of the term must shall 59 qualify within the time prescribed by law for qualifying for 60 other offices to be filled by election at such general election. 61 (c)âIf such a vacancy occurs before prior to the primary 62 election but on or after the ninth day before the first day set 63 by law for qualifying, the Secretary of State must shall set 64 dates for qualifying for the unexpired portion of the term of 65 such office. Any person seeking nomination or election to the 66 unexpired portion of the term must shall qualify within the time 67 set by the Secretary of State. If time does not permit party 68 nominations to be made in conjunction with the primary election, 69 the Governor must may call a special primary election to select 70 party nominees for the unexpired portion of such term and, if 71 necessary, a special election. 72 (2)âWhenever there is a vacancy for which a special 73 election is required pursuant to s. 100.101, the Governor, after 74 consultation with the Secretary of State, shall fix the dates of 75 a special primary election and a special election within 14 days 76 after the vacancy occurs. Nominees of political parties shall be 77 chosen under the primary laws of this state in the special 78 primary election to become candidates in the special election. 79 (a)âBefore Prior to setting the special election dates, the 80 Governor shall consult with the Secretary of State and the 81 supervisor of elections consider any upcoming elections in the 82 jurisdiction where the special election will be held. The dates 83 fixed by the Governor must shall be the earliest dates feasible, 84 must be specific days certain, and may shall not be established 85 by the happening of a condition or stated in the alternative. 86 The dates fixed must shall provide a minimum of 8 2 weeks 87 between each election, but no more than 12 weeks. If a vacancy 88 occurs in the office of state senator or member of the House of 89 Representatives less than 126 days before the first day of the 90 regular legislative session, the Governor must, within 5 days 91 after the occurrence of the vacancy, fix the dates of a special 92 primary election and a special election to fill the vacancy. The 93 dates set by the Governor must provide for at least 2 weeks 94 between the special primary election and the special election 95 and must ensure that both elections are held before the first 96 day of the regular legislative session to prevent a lapse in 97 representation. 98 1.âIf the Governor fails to issue an order setting the 99 dates of the special primary election and special election 100 within the days prescribed in this subsection, any qualified 101 elector residing within the affected district may file a 102 petition in the circuit court having jurisdiction seeking 103 judicial determination of such election dates. 104 2.âUpon finding that the Governor has failed to comply with 105 this subsection, the circuit court shall have the authority to 106 fix and declare the earliest feasible and lawful dates for the 107 special primary election and special election, consistent with 108 the requirements of this chapter and the Florida Election Code. 109 3.âThe court shall expedite consideration of any petition 110 filed under this subsection to ensure the timely filling of the 111 vacancy and to safeguard the right of representation for voters 112 within the affected district. 113 (b)âThe special election must be held no later than 126 114 days after the vacancy occurs, except in the following cases: 115 1.âIf a supervisor where the special election will be held 116 certifies that holding the special election within the required 117 time period would conflict with scheduled elections and impose 118 an undue hardship on the orderly administration of elections, 119 the special election must be held no later than 175 days after 120 the vacancy occurs. 121 2.âIn the event a vacancy occurs in the office of state 122 senator or member of the House of Representatives when the 123 Legislature is in regular legislative session, the minimum times 124 prescribed by this subsection may be waived upon concurrence of 125 the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and 126 the President of the Senate. If a vacancy occurs in the office 127 of state senator and no session of the Legislature is scheduled 128 to be held prior to the next general election, the Governor may 129 fix the dates for the special primary election and for the 130 special election to coincide with the dates of the primary 131 election and general election. 132 3.âIf a vacancy in office occurs in any district in the 133 state Senate or House of Representatives or in any congressional 134 district, and no session of the Legislature, or session of 135 Congress if the vacancy is in a congressional district, is 136 scheduled to be held during the unexpired portion of the term, 137 the Governor is not required to call a special election to fill 138 such vacancy. 139 (c)âIf possible, the Governor must fix dates to coincide 140 with scheduled elections where the special election will be 141 held. A special election held to fill a vacancy caused by a 142 resignation submitted pursuant to s. 99.012 must be held no 143 later than the election for which the resigning officer seeks to 144 qualify. 145 (d)(a)âThe dates for candidates to qualify in such special 146 election or special primary election must shall be fixed by the 147 Department of State, and candidates must shall qualify no not 148 later than noon of the last day so fixed. The dates fixed for 149 qualifying must shall allow a minimum of 14 days between the 150 last day of qualifying and the special primary election. 151 (e)(b)âThe filing of campaign expense statements by 152 candidates in such special elections or special primaries and by 153 committees making contributions or expenditures to influence the 154 results of such special primaries or special elections may shall 155 be not be later than such dates as shall be fixed by the 156 Department of State, and in fixing such dates the Department of 157 State shall take into consideration and be governed by the 158 practical time limitations. 159 (f)(c)âThe dates for a candidate to qualify by the petition 160 process pursuant to s. 99.095 in such special primary or special 161 election shall be fixed by the Department of State. In fixing 162 such dates the Department of State shall take into consideration 163 and be governed by the practical time limitations. Any candidate 164 seeking to qualify by the petition process in a special primary 165 election must shall obtain 25 percent of the signatures required 166 by s. 99.095. 167 (g)(d)âThe qualifying fees and party assessments of such 168 candidates as may qualify must shall be the same as collected 169 for the same office at the last previous primary for that 170 office. The party assessment must shall be paid to the 171 appropriate executive committee of the political party to which 172 the candidate belongs. 173 (h)(e)âEach county canvassing board shall make as speedy a 174 return of the result of such special primary elections and 175 special elections as time will permit, and the Elections 176 Canvassing Commission likewise shall make as speedy a canvass 177 and declaration of the nominees as time will permit. 178 (i)âIf only one candidate qualifies in a special election, 179 he or she is deemed elected on the last day of the qualifying 180 period. If the winner of a special primary election does not 181 have opposition in the special election, he or she is deemed 182 elected at the special primary election. In either case, the 183 person elected takes office upon election or upon the office 184 becoming vacant, whichever occurs later. 185 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 100.141, Florida 186 Statutes, is amended to read: 187 100.141âNotice of special election to fill any vacancy in 188 office.â 189 (1)âWhenever a special election is required to fill any 190 vacancy in office, the Governor, after consultation with the 191 Secretary of State and the supervisor of elections of any 192 affected county, shall issue an order declaring on what day the 193 election shall be held and deliver the order to the Department 194 of State. The Governor shall issue the order within 14 days 195 after the occurrence of the vacancy or, for vacancies arising 196 due to a resignation pursuant to s. 99.012, within 14 days after 197 the written resignation is submitted to the Governor, whichever 198 is sooner. 199 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.